Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 6
CONDUCT OF ELECTIONS

1-13.5-601. Hours of voting.

At all elections held under this article, the polls shall be opened at 7 a.m. and remain open until 7 p.m. of the same day. If a full set of election judges is not present at the hour of 7 a.m., an alternate election judge shall be appointed by the designated election official or judge in attendance at the polling place. The polls shall be opened if at least two election judges are present, even if the alternate judge has not arrived. Every person otherwise qualified to vote who is standing in line waiting to vote at 7 p.m. may vote.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 21, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-602. Watchers - definition.

Each candidate for office, or interested party in case of a ballot issue or ballot question, at a local government election is entitled to appoint an eligible elector to act on his or her behalf in every polling place in which he or she is a candidate or in which the issue or question is on the ballot; except that neither a current candidate for director nor any immediate family member, to the second degree, of such candidate is eligible to serve as a watcher for that candidate.
(1) (a) (I) Each candidate for office, or interested party in case of a ballot issue or ballot question, at a local government election is entitled to appoint an eligible elector to act on his or her behalf in every polling place in which he or she is a candidate or in which the issue or question is on the ballot; except that neither a current candidate for director nor any immediate family member, to the second degree, of such candidate is eligible to serve as a watcher for that candidate.

As used in this section, "interested party" means an issue committee whose issue is on the ballot.

The candidates or interested parties shall certify the name of the persons so appointed to the designated election official on forms provided by the designated election official. If multiple names are certified to the designated election official for or against any ballot issue or ballot question, and the designated election official reasonably determines that multiple watchers will impede the conduct of the election, the designated election official may, by lot, reduce the number of watchers to one for and one against the ballot issue or ballot question for each location to be watched.

In case a watcher must leave the polling place, the watcher may designate an alternate to act on his or her behalf while he or she is absent if the alternate is made known to the election judges by an affidavit of the person first named as a watcher. A watcher serving at the polling place has the right to remain inside the polling place from at least fifteen minutes prior to the opening of the polls until after the completion of the count of votes cast at the election and the certification of the count by the election judges. Each watcher may maintain a list of eligible electors as the names are announced by the election judges and witness each step in the conduct of the election.

Watchers shall take an oath administered by one of the election judges that they are eligible electors, that their name has been submitted to the designated election official as a watcher for this election, and that they will not in any manner make known to anyone the result of counting votes until the polls have closed.

Watchers shall not:

Interrupt or disrupt the processing, verification, or counting of any ballots or any other stage of the election;

Write down any ballot numbers or any other identifying information about the electors;

Handle the pollbooks, affidavits and self-affirmations, ballots, mail ballot envelopes, absentee ballot envelopes, voting or counting machines, or machine components;

Interfere with the orderly conduct of any election process, including issuance of ballots, receiving of ballots, and voting or counting of ballots;

Interact with election officials or election judges except for the individual identified by the designated election official; or

Have a cellular phone, camera, recording device, laptop or tablet, or other electronic data capture device in the polling place.

A designated election official may remove a watcher upon finding that the watcher commits or encourages fraud in connection with his or her duties, violates any of the limitations outlined in this article, violates his or her oath, or is abusive or threatening toward election officials or any other person.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 21, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(1)(a)(I) amended, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1268, § 7, effective August 10.

1-13.5-603. Judges open ballot box first.

In polling places that use an electronic voting system or paper ballots, the election judges, immediately before the opening of the polls, shall open the ballot box in the presence of the people assembled in the polling place, turn it upside down so as to empty it of all of its contents, and then lock it securely. The ballot box must not be reopened until the time for counting the ballots it contains.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 22, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-604. Judge to keep pollbook.

An election judge shall keep a pollbook, which shall contain one column headed "names of voters" and one column headed "number on ballot". The name and number on the ballot of each eligible elector voting must be entered in regular succession under the headings in the pollbook.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 23, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-605. Preparing to vote.

Any eligible elector desiring to vote shall write his or her name and address on a form available at the polling place and shall give the form to one of the election judges, who shall thereupon announce the same clearly and audibly. If the elector is unable to write, he or she may request assistance from one of the election judges, and such judge shall sign the form and witness the elector's mark. The form made available must contain in substance the following:

Any person desiring to vote at any special district election as an eligible elector who does not appear on the registration list or property owners list for the district shall sign a self-affirmation that the person is an elector of the special district. The self-affirming oath or affirmation shall be on a form that contains in substance the following:

A person otherwise eligible to vote in a local government election that is not a special district election whose name has been omitted from the registration list or property owner's list shall be permitted to vote by:

Taking substantially the following self-affirmation:

Presenting to an election judge a certificate of registration issued on election day by the county clerk and recorder or a certificate of property ownership issued on election day by the county assessor as applicable; or

An election judge verifying, on election day, the person's registration with the county clerk and recorder or through the statewide voter registration records maintained by the secretary of state, or, as applicable, obtaining verification of the person's property ownership from the county assessor.

An election judge shall promptly contact the county clerk and recorder or the county assessor for verification required under paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section so that every eligible elector present at the polling place is allowed to vote. Notation of verification of registration or property ownership shall be made in the pollbook next to the eligible elector's name.

The self-affirmation provided in subsection (2) of this section must be accepted in lieu of the verification of registration or property ownership unless the person's right to vote is successfully challenged.

Besides the election officials, not more than four eligible electors in excess of the number of voting booths or voting machines are allowed within the immediate voting area at one time.

The completed signature forms must be returned with other election materials to the designated election official. If no challenges are made, the forms may be destroyed after forty-five days following election day.

In precincts using paper ballots, an election judge shall give the eligible elector one, and only one, ballot, which the election judge shall remove from the package of ballots by tearing or cutting the ballot along the perforated or dotted line. Before delivering the ballot to an elector, the election judge having charge of the ballots shall endorse his or her initials on the duplicate stub. An election judge shall enter the name of the elector and number of said ballot in the pollbook.

I state under penalty of perjury that I am an elector who is eligible to vote each of the ballots that I have cast in this election; that my signature and name are as shown on this document; that I have not and will not cast more than one ballot for a matter to be decided in this election; and that my ballots are cast in accordance with applicable law.
Name: ..................................
Date:
....................................
Signature of elector: ...................................
If the person's name is found on the registration list or property owners list, as applicable, by the election judge having charge thereof, he or she shall repeat the name, and the elector shall be allowed to enter the immediate voting area.

I, (printed name), who reside at (address), am an elector of this (name of special district) district and desire to vote at this election. I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I am registered to vote in the state of Colorado and qualified to vote in this special district election as:
____ a resident of the district or area to be included in the district; or
____ the owner of taxable real or personal property situated within the boundaries of the special district or area to be included within the special district; or
____ a person who is obligated to pay taxes under a contract to purchase taxable property in the special district or the area to be included within the special district; or
____ the spouse or civil union partner of (name of spouse or civil union partner) who is the owner of taxable real or personal property situated within the boundaries of the special district or area to be included within the special district.
I have not voted previously at this election.
Date ________________
Signature of elector ________________.

I do solemnly swear or affirm that I am a citizen of the United States of the age of eighteen years or older; that I am a registered elector in this political subdivision; that I am eligible to vote at this election; and that I have not previously voted at this election; or

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 23, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-606. Manner of voting in precincts using paper ballots.

In precincts that use paper ballots, upon receiving his or her ballot, an eligible elector shall immediately retire alone to one of the voting booths provided and shall prepare the ballot by marking or stamping in ink or indelible pencil, in the appropriate margin or place, a cross mark (x) opposite the name of the candidate of the elector's choice for each office to be filled; except that no cross mark (x) is required opposite the name of a write-in candidate. In case of a question submitted to a vote of the people, the elector shall mark or stamp, in the appropriate margin or place, a cross mark (x) opposite the answer that he or she desires to give. Before leaving the voting booth, the elector shall fold the ballot without displaying the marks thereon so that the contents of the ballot are concealed and the stub can be removed without exposing any of the contents of the ballot, and the elector must keep the ballot folded until the elector deposits the ballot in the ballot box.

Each eligible elector who has prepared a ballot and is ready to cast his or her vote shall then leave the voting booth and approach the election judge in charge of the ballot box. The elector shall give his or her name to that judge, who shall announce the name of such elector and the number upon the duplicate stub of the ballot, which number must correspond with the stub number previously placed on the registration list or pollbook. If the stub number of the ballot corresponds and is identified by the initials of the election judge placed thereupon, the election judge shall then remove the duplicate stub from the ballot. The ballot must then be returned to the eligible elector, who shall, in full view of the election judges, cast his or her vote by depositing the ballot in the ballot box.

Each eligible elector shall mark and deposit his or her ballot without undue delay and shall leave the immediate voting area as soon as the elector votes. No elector shall occupy a voting booth already occupied by another, nor remain within the immediate voting area for more than ten minutes, nor occupy a voting booth for more than five minutes if all such booths are in use and other electors are waiting to occupy the same. No eligible elector whose name has been entered on the pollbook is allowed to reenter the immediate voting area during the election except when accompanied by an election judge.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 25, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-607. Eligible elector requiring assistance.

Notwithstanding any provision of section 1-13.5-606 to the contrary, if, at any election, an eligible elector declares under oath to the election judges of the polling place that, by reason of visual impairment or other physical disability or inability to read or write, the elector is unable to prepare his or her ballot or operate the voting machine without assistance, the elector may, upon request, receive the assistance of any one of the election judges or, at the elector's option, any other person selected by the elector requiring assistance. No person, other than an election judge, is permitted to enter a voting booth as an assistant to more than one elector.

A notation must be made in the pollbook opposite the name of each voter thus assisted indicating that the voter was assisted.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 25, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-608. Spoiled ballots.

In polling places that use an electronic voting system or paper ballots, no person shall take or remove any ballot from the polling place before the close of the polls. If any elector spoils a ballot, he or she may successively obtain others, one at a time, not exceeding three in all, upon returning each spoiled one. The spoiled ballots so returned shall be immediately canceled and shall be preserved and returned to the designated election official along with other election records and supplies.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 26, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-609. Counting paper ballots.

As soon as the polls at any election are finally closed, the election judges shall immediately open the ballot box and proceed to count the votes cast, and, before the election judges adjourn, the counting thereof shall continue until finished. The election judges shall first count the number of ballots in the box. If the ballots are found to exceed the number of names entered on the pollbook, the election judges shall then examine the official endorsements upon the ballots, and if, in the unanimous opinion of the judges, any of the ballots in excess of the number on the pollbook do not bear the proper official endorsement, they shall be put into a separate pile, and a separate record and return of the votes in such ballots shall be made under the heading "excess ballots". When the ballots and the pollbook agree, the election judges shall proceed to count the votes. Each ballot shall be read and counted separately, and every name separately marked as voted for on such ballot where there is no conflict to obscure the intention of the voter, and shall be read and marked upon the tally sheets before proceeding to any other ballot. Each ballot, excepting excess ballots, shall be read and counted and placed upon the tally sheets in like manner.

When all the votes have been read and counted, the ballots, together with one of the tally lists, shall be placed in a box or appropriate container, and the opening shall be carefully sealed, and each of the election judges shall place his or her initials on said seal. The sealed box shall be delivered to the designated election official pursuant to section 1-13.5-614.

All persons, except election judges and watchers, are excluded from the place where the counting is being carried on until the count has been completed.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 26, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-610. Counting by counting judges.

In precincts with counting judges, the receiving judges as directed by the designated election official shall deliver to the counting judges the ballot box containing cast ballots and the receiving judges shall then use another ballot box furnished for voting. The receiving judges shall open, empty, and lock the alternate ballot box in the manner prescribed in section 1-13.5-603.

When the counting judges have counted the votes in a ballot box, they shall return the empty ballot box to the receiving judges and exchange it for the box containing ballots cast since taking possession of the first ballot box. The judges shall continue to exchange ballot boxes in the same manner until the polls are closed and shall continue counting until all ballots have been counted.

When an exchange of ballot boxes is made as described in subsection (2) of this section, the receiving judges shall sign and furnish to the counting judges a statement showing the number of ballots that are to be found in each ballot box as indicated by the pollbooks. The counting judges shall then count ballots in the manner prescribed in section 1-13.5-609.

The designated election official may provide a separate room or building for the counting judges.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 26, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-611. Tally sheets.

As the election judges open and read the ballots, the votes that each candidate and any ballot issue or ballot question received must be carefully marked down, upon tally sheets prepared by the designated election official for that purpose, by any appropriate election official.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 27, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-612. Defective ballots.

If an elector votes for more names than there are persons to be elected to an office, or, if it is impossible to determine the choice of an elector for an office to be filled, the elector's ballot will not be counted for that office. A defective or an incomplete cross marked on any ballot in a proper place must be counted if there is no other mark or cross on such ballot indicating an intention to vote for some person other than those indicated by the first mentioned defective cross or mark. No ballot without the official endorsement, except as provided in section 1-13.5-704, may be deposited in the ballot box, and only ballots provided in accordance with this article shall be counted. If the election judges discover in the counting of votes that the name of any candidate voted for is misspelled or the initial letters of a candidate's given name are transposed or omitted in part or altogether on the ballot, the vote for the candidate must be counted if the intention of the elector to vote for the candidate is apparent.

Ballots not counted must be marked "defective" on the back thereof and shall be preserved for such time as is provided in section 1-13.5-616 for ballots and destroyed as therein directed.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 27, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-613. Judges' certificate - statement on ballots.

As soon as all the votes have been read and counted, the election judges shall make a certificate stating:

The name of each candidate, designating the office for which each candidate received votes;

The number of votes each candidate received, which number must be expressed in words, at full length, and in numerical figures; and

The ballot issue or ballot question, if any, voted upon and the number of votes counted for and against the ballot issue or ballot question.

In addition, the election judges shall make a statement in writing showing the number of ballots voted, containing a separate statement that identifies and specifies each of the following:

The number of ballots delivered to electors;

The number of ballots not delivered to electors;

The number of unofficial and substitute ballots voted;

The number of spoiled ballots; and

The number of ballots returned.

All unused ballots, spoiled ballots, and stubs of ballots voted must be returned with the statement described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2).

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 27, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-614. Delivery of election returns, ballot boxes, and other election papers.

When all the votes have been read and counted, an election judge shall deliver to the designated election official the certificate and statement required by section 1-13.5-613, the ballot boxes and all keys or seals thereto, and the registration and property owners lists, pollbooks, tally sheets, spoiled ballots, unused ballots, ballot stubs, oaths, affidavits, and other election papers and supplies. The delivery must be made at once and with all convenient speed, and informality in delivery does not invalidate the vote of any polling place when delivery has been made prior to the completion of the official abstract of the votes by the canvassers pursuant to section 1-13.5-1305. The designated election official shall provide a receipt for all papers so delivered.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 28, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-615. Abstract of votes - judges to post returns.

In addition to all certificates otherwise required to be made of the count of votes cast at any election, the election judges are required to make an abstract of the count of votes containing the names of the offices, the names of the candidates, any ballot issues or ballot questions voted upon, and the number of votes counted for and against each candidate or ballot measure.

Suitable blanks for the required abstract shall be prepared, printed, and furnished to all election judges at the same time and in the same manner as other election supplies are furnished.

Immediately upon completion of the count, the abstract required under subsection (1) of this section must be posted in a conspicuous place that can be seen from the outside of the polling place. The abstract may be removed at any time forty-eight hours after the polls close.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 28, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-616. Preservation of ballots and election records.

The ballots, when not required to be taken from the sealed box for the purpose of election contests, shall remain in the sealed box in the custody of the designated election official until twenty-five months after the date the polls closed for the election at which the ballots were cast or until the time has expired for which the ballots would be needed in any contest proceedings, at which time the sealed box must be opened by the designated election official and the ballots destroyed by fire, shredding, burial, or by any other method approved by the governing body.

The designated election official shall preserve all other official election records and forms for at least six months following the date the polls closed.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 29, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-617. Ranked voting methods.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, a local government may use a ranked voting method to conduct a regular election to elect the members of the governing body of the local government in accordance with section 1-7-1003, and the rules adopted by the secretary of state pursuant to section 1-7-1004.

A local government conducting an election using a ranked voting method may adapt the requirements of this article, including requirements concerning the form of the ballot, the method of marking the ballot, the procedure for counting ballots, and the form of the election judges' certificate, as necessary for compatibility with the ranked voting method.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 29, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-618. Covered voters to receive mail ballots.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article 13.5 to the contrary, the designated election official of a local government shall mail a ballot to every eligible elector of the local government who is a covered voter, as that term is defined in section 1-8.3-102, for any election conducted under this article 13.5.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 29, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-160), ch. 133, p. 537, § 4, effective September 7.